Louisiana, session 2026, HB330.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:101(B) and 225(B)(1) and (2) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 14:225(D) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§101. Desecration of graves
* * *
B.(1) Whoever commits the crime of desecration of graves shall be fined not
more than five hundred one thousand dollars, or imprisoned for not more than six
months, or both.
(2) In addition to the penalties listed in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, the
court shall order the offender to make restitution pursuant to Code of Criminal
Procedure Article 883.2 for damages sustained.
* * *
§225. Institutional vandalism
* * *
B. Institutional vandalism is punishable as follows:
(1) When the damage is less than five hundred dollars, the offender shall be
fined not more than five hundred one thousand dollars, or imprisoned for not more
than six months, or both.
(2) When the damage amounts to five hundred dollars but less than fifty
thousand dollars, the offender shall be fined not more less than one thousand dollars
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 330 ENROLLED
nor more than five thousand dollars, or imprisoned, with or without hard labor, for
not more than two years, or both.
* * *
D. In addition to the penalties listed in Subsection B of this Section, when
the vandalized institution is a religious building or structure as identified in
Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section, the court shall order the offender to make
restitution pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Article 883.2 for damages
sustained.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.